Vermont, session 2025-2026, S282.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Preserving Revenue for
State Programs and Economic Resiliency Act.”
VT LEG #385899 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.282
2026 Page 2 of 14
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 5822a is added to read:
§ 5822a. PERSONAL INCOME TAX SURCHARGE
(a) There shall be a surcharge applied to the federal adjusted gross income
of individuals with federal adjusted gross income equal to or greater than
$250,000.00. The surcharge shall be at a rate of two percent of the adjusted
gross income exceeding $250,000.00. The surcharge shall be in addition to
any tax assessed under this chapter and shall be paid, collected, and enforced in
the same manner as the tax assessed under section 5822 of this title.
(b) There shall be an additional surcharge applied to the federal adjusted
gross income of individuals with federal adjusted gross income equal to or
greater than $500,000.00. The surcharge shall be at a rate of six percent of the
adjusted gross income exceeding $500,000.00. The surcharge shall be in
addition to any tax assessed under this chapter and shall be paid, collected, and
enforced in the same manner as the tax assessed under section 5822 of this
title.
(c) The surcharges imposed under this section shall be applied to
individuals without regard for filing status.
(d) Annually, the Commissioner of Taxes shall use the process required
under subdivision 5822(b)(2) of this title to adjust for inflation the minimum
amount of federal adjusted gross income necessary for an individual to incur a
surcharge under this section.
VT LEG #385899 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.282
2026 Page 3 of 14
Sec. 3. 32 V.S.A. chapter 149 is added to read:
CHAPTER 149. WEALTH PROCEEDS TAX
§ 5701. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Federal modified adjusted gross income” means modified adjusted
gross income as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 1411(d).
(2) “Incomplete gift nongrantor trust” means a resident trust that meets
the following conditions:
(A) the trust does not qualify as a grantor trust under 26 U.S.C.
§§ 671–679; and
(B) the grantor’s transfer of assets to the trust is treated as an
incomplete gift under 26 U.S.C. § 2511.
(3) “Taxable income” has the same meaning as in subdivision 5811(21)
of this title.
(4) “Taxable year” has the same meaning as in subdivision 5811(16) of
this title.
(5) “Threshold amount” has the same meaning as in 26 U.S.C.
§ 1411(b).
(6) “Wealth proceeds” has the same meaning as net investment income
in 26 U.S.C. § 1411(c) as adjusted by section 5702 of this chapter.
VT LEG #385899 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.282
2026 Page 4 of 14
§ 5702. DETERMINATION OF WEALTH PROCEEDS
The wealth proceeds of an individual, estate, or trust means net investment
income, as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 1411(c), and:
(1) increased by the following to the extent they are excluded from net
investment income:
(A) income from state and local obligations outside Vermont;
(B) net gain excluded under 26 U.S.C. § 1202;
(C) net gain excluded under 26 U.S.C. § 1400Z-2;
(D) net gain attributable to disposition of property held in trade or
business not described under 26 U.S.C. § 1411(c)(2);
(E) net gain described under the exception in 26 U.S.C. § 1411(c)(4);
(F) net gain excluded under 26 U.S.C. § 1411(c)(5), provided it is
attributable to net unrealized appreciation within the meaning of 26 U.S.C.
§ 402(e)(4); and
(G) for a taxpayer who transferred property to an incomplete gift
nongrantor trust, any amounts recognized as wealth proceeds under this section
held by the trust, but reduced by any deductions of the trust, to the extent the
wealth proceeds and deductions of the trust would be taken into account in
computing the taxpayer’s federal taxable income if the trust in its entirety were
treated as a grantor trust for federal tax purposes; and
VT LEG #385899 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.282
2026 Page 5 of 14
(2) decreased by the following to the extent they are included in net
investment income:
(A) income from U.S. government obligations; and
(B) any amount exempted from state taxation under the laws of the
United States.
§ 5703. IMPOSITION OF WEALTH PROCEEDS TAX
(a) A wealth proceeds tax is imposed for each taxable year on individuals,
estates, and trusts subject to personal income tax pursuant to chapter 151 of
this title as follows:
(1) individuals filing as single or head of household with taxable income
exceeding $200,000.00;
(2) married individuals filing jointly with taxable income exceeding
$250,000.00;
(3) individuals filing as married filing separately with taxable income
exceeding $125,000.00; and
(4) estates and trusts with taxable income exceeding $15,200.00.
(b) The tax imposed under this section shall be in addition to any other tax
imposed under this title.
(c) Tax is imposed at the rate of four percent of the lesser of:
VT LEG #385899 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.282
2026 Page 6 of 14
(1) wealth proceeds for the taxable year; or
(2) federal modified adjusted gross income for the taxable year, reduced
by the threshold amount.
(d) For part-year and nonresident individuals, estates, and trusts, the tax
imposed by this section shall be calculated by multiplying a taxpayer’s total
amount of wealth proceeds for the taxable year by the percentage of wealth
proceeds allocable to Vermont under section 5823 of this title.
§ 5704. ADMINISTRATION
The tax imposed under this chapter shall be administered and enforced
under this chapter in the same manner as the income tax imposed under section
5822 of this chapter, including all provisions relating to deficiencies,
assessments, refunds, appeals, enforcement, and collection under chapter 151,
subchapters 8 and 9 of this title.
Sec. 4. 32 V.S.A. § 4152a is added to read:
§ 4152a. PROPERTY TAX CLASSIFICATIONS
(a) The grand list of a town shall include one or more tax classifications for
each parcel of real estate. A parcel shall be classified using one of the general
classes of real estate listed under subsection (b) of this section and based on the
considerations set forth in this section and by guidance provided by the
Division of Property Valuation and Review. The listers and assessors shall
annually update the grand list to include a tax classification not later than June
VT LEG #385899 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.282
2026 Page 7 of 14
1 of every year, using information submitted to the Department of Taxes
pursuant to this section. The tax classification may be updated after June 1
when a taxpayer files a, or corrects an erroneously filed, homestead declaration
after June 1.
(b) A parcel shall be assigned one or more of the following general classes:
(1) homestead;
(2) nonhomestead nonresidential;
(3) nonhomestead residential; and
(4) nonhomestead seasonal.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) “Homestead” means a parcel, or portion of a parcel, declared as a
homestead on or before October 15 in accordance with section 5410 of this
title for the current year.
(2) “Nonhomestead nonresidential” means a parcel, or portion of a
parcel, that does not qualify as homestead or nonhomestead residential under
this section.
(3) “Nonhomestead residential” means a parcel, or portion of a parcel,
for which a homestead was not declared in accordance with section 5410 of
this title for the current year and that has a residential property, as defined by
the Commissioner by rule.
VT LEG #385899 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.282
2026 Page 8 of 14
(4) “Nonhomestead seasonal” means a parcel, or portion of a parcel, that
would qualify as nonhomestead residential, except the parcel has no residential
property fit for habitation on a year-round basis. The Commissioner shall
adopt rules further defining residential property fit for habitation on a year-
round basis.
(d) A parcel with two or more portions qualifying for different tax
classifications under this section shall be classified proportionally based on the
percentage of floor space used.
(1) In the case of a homestead with 25 percent or less of floor space used
for a business purpose, the parcel shall be classified as a homestead pursuant to
subdivision 5401(7)(F) of this title.
(2) If a portion of floor space is used for more than one purpose, the use
for which the floor space is most often used shall be considered the primary
use, and the floor space shall be dedicated to that use for purposes of tax
classification.
(e) The Commissioner shall amend existing forms, and publish new forms,
as needed to gather the necessary attestations and declarations required under
this section.
(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the tax treatment or
enrollment eligibility of property as it relates to use value appraisal under
chapter 124 of this title.
VT LEG #385899 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.282
2026 Page 9 of 14
(g) Persons aggrieved by a decision to classify property for taxation
purposes under this section may appeal in the manner provided for property
valuation appeals under this title.
Sec. 5. 32 V.S.A. § 4152 is amended to read:
§ 4152. CONTENTS
(a) When completed, the grand list of a town shall be in such form as the
Director prescribes and shall contain such information as the Director
prescribes, including:
(1) In alphabetical order, the name of each real property owner and each
owner of taxable personal property.
(2) The last known mailing address of all such owners.
(3) A brief description of each parcel of taxable real estate in the town,
including a classification assigned pursuant to section 4152a of this title.
“Parcel” As used in this subdivision, “parcel” means a separate and sellable lot
or piece of real estate. Parcels may be combined to represent all contiguous
land in the same ownership, together with all improvements thereon.
* * *
Sec. 6. 32 V.S.A. § 5402 is amended to read:
§ 5402. EDUCATION PROPERTY TAX LIABILITY
(a) A statewide education tax is imposed on all nonhomestead and
homestead property at the following rates:
VT LEG #385899 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.282
2026 Page 10 of 14
(1) The tax rate for nonhomestead nonresidential and nonhomestead
seasonal property shall be $1.59 per $100.00 divided by the statewide
adjustment.
(2) The tax rate for homestead property shall be $1.00 multiplied by the
education property tax spending adjustment for the municipality per $100.00 of
equalized education property value as most recently determined under section
5405 of this title. The homestead property tax rate for each municipality that is
a member of a union or unified union school district shall be calculated as
required under subsection (e) of this section.
(3) The tax rate for nonhomestead residential property shall be $2.00
multiplied by the education property tax spending adjustment for the
municipality per $100.00 of equalized education property value as most
recently determined under section 5405 of this title. The Commissioner of
Taxes shall determine a nonhomestead residential education tax rate for each
municipality that is a member of a union or unified union school district using
the same process as is used for homesteads under subsection (e) of this section.
Nonhomestead residential property shall use the same property dollar
equivalent yield as homesteads in the same municipality.
* * *
VT LEG #385899 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.282
2026 Page 11 of 14
Sec. 7. 32 V.S.A. § 5402b is amended to read:
§ 5402b. STATEWIDE EDUCATION TAX YIELDS;
RECOMMENDATION OF THE COMMISSIONER
(a) Annually, not later than December 1, the Commissioner of Taxes, after
consultation with the Secretary of Education, the Secretary of Administration,
and the Joint Fiscal Office, shall calculate and recommend a property dollar
equivalent yield, an income dollar equivalent yield, and a nonhomestead
property tax rate for the following fiscal year. In making these calculations,
the Commissioner shall assume:
* * *
(4) the percentage change in the average education tax bill applied to
nonhomestead nonresidential property and, the percentage change in the
average education tax bill applied to nonhomestead seasonal property, the
percentage change in the average education tax bill applied to nonhomestead
residential property, the percentage change in the average education tax bill of
homestead property, and the percentage change in the average education tax
bill for taxpayers who claim a credit under subsection 6066(a) of this title are
equal;
* * *
VT LEG #385899 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.282
2026 Page 12 of 14
Sec. 8. 16 V.S.A. § 3444 is added to read:
§ 3444. SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION AID SPECIAL FUND
(a) Creation. There is created the School Construction Aid Special Fund,
to be administered by the Agency of Education. Monies in the Fund shall be
used for the purposes of:
(1) awarding aid to school construction projects under section 3448 of
this title;
(2) awarding grants through the Facilities Master Plan Grant Program
established in section 3441 of this title;
(3) funding administrative costs of the State Aid for Capital
Construction Costs program; and
(4) awarding emergency aid under section 3448 of this title.
(b) Funds. The Fund shall consist of:
(1) half of the revenue generated by education property tax imposed on
nonhomestead residential properties;
(2) any amounts transferred or appropriated to it by the General
Assembly; and
(3) any interest earned by the Fund.
VT LEG #385899 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.282
2026 Page 13 of 14
Sec. 9. 16 V.S.A. § 4025 is amended to read:
§ 4025. EDUCATION FUND
(a) The Education Fund is established to comprise the following:
(1) all revenue paid to the State from the statewide education tax on
nonhomestead and homestead property under 32 V.S.A. chapter 135, except
revenue deposited in the School Construction Aid Special Fund pursuant to
subdivision 3444(b)(1) of this title;
* * *
Sec. 10. PROPERTY TAX CLASSIFICATIONS; TRANSITION; DATA
COLLECTION
(a) For calendar year 2027, the Commissioner of Taxes shall amend and
create forms so that taxpayers report information on the use of their property
for such property to be classified as homestead, nonhomestead residential,
nonhomestead nonresidential, nonhomestead seasonal, or a proportional
classification of those uses. The information collected, and classifications
determined, shall align with the definitions and requirements of Sec. 1 of this
act. The Commissioner shall use the information to determine and assign a tax
classification for every grand list parcel and, on or before October 1, 2027, the
Commissioner shall provide that information to the Joint Fiscal Office.
(b) On or before August 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Taxes shall publish
guidance that interprets and explains the statutory definitions from Sec. 1 of
VT LEG #385899 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.282
2026 Page 14 of 14
this act, which shall serve as the Department’s official interpretation until the
Commissioner adopts rules relating to the property classification system
created by this act.
Sec. 11. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section, Sec. 1 (short title), and Sec. 10 (transition provisions) shall
take effect on passage.
(b) Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, Sec. 2 (income tax surcharge) shall
take effect retroactively on January 1, 2026, and apply to taxable years
beginning on and after January 1, 2026.
(c) Sec. 3 (wealth proceeds tax) shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
(d) Secs. 4–9 (new property tax classifications and rates) shall take effect
on January 1, 2028.
VT LEG #385899 v.1